District of Columbia statutes.
2-1210.09

Quarterly and annual reports.

During each fiscal year of participation, financial institutions shall submit quarterly reports and a comprehensive annual report to the Mayor for the year. The reports shall:

(1)

Provide information regarding outstanding capital access loans, capital access loan losses, and any other information on capital access loans that the Mayor considers appropriate;

(2)

State the total amount of loans for which the financial institution has made a contribution from the fund under this subchapter;

(3)

Include a copy of the financial institution’s most recent financial statement; and

(4)

Include information regarding the type and size of businesses and nonprofit organizations with enrolled loans.

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-322, § 10, 57 DCR 12442
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 10 of Capital Access Program Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-598, November 17, 2010, 57 DCR 11018).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 10 of Capital Access Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-6, February 11, 2011, 58 DCR 1408).